District of Columbia statutes.
8-113.04

Interim prohibition for installation.

From March 8, 1991, until the effective date of the rules issued pursuant to § 8-113.12 regarding performance standards for new underground storage tanks, no person may install an underground storage tank to store a regulated substance unless the tank, whether of single or double wall construction, complies with the District of Columbia Fire Prevention Code and the new tank performance standards set forth in 40 C.F.R. part 280 .

History

Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-242, § 5, 38 DCR 344

Section References

This section is referenced in § 8-113.09.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-995.4.